Maryland, session 2025, HB1015.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–103.
(a) Except as provided in subsections (b), (e), [and] (f), AND (G) of this section,
each public school under the jurisdiction of a county board:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1015*

HOUSE BILL 1015
(1) (i) Shall be open for pupil attendance for at least 180 actual school
days and a minimum of 1,080 school hours during a 10–month period in each school year;
or
(ii) If normal school attendance is prevented because of conditions
described in subsection (b) of this section, shall be open for at least 1,080 hours during a
10–month period;
(2) Shall be open for pupil attendance a minimum of 3 hours during each
school day;
(3) BEGINNING IN THE 2027–2028 SCHOOL YEAR:
(I) FOR A MIDDLE SCHOOL, SHALL BEGIN INSTRUCTION NOT
EARLIER THAN 8 A.M.; AND
(II) FOR A HIGH SCHOOL, SHALL BEGIN INSTRUCTION NOT
EARLIER THAN 8:30 A.M.; and
[(3)] (4) May not be open on Saturdays, Sundays, or holidays in order to
meet the 180–day or 1,080–hour requirement of this subsection.
(b) (1) If a county board submits a written application to the State Board that
describes a demonstrated effort by the county board to comply with subsection (a) of this
section, the State Board may [permit] ALLOW:
(i) The following adjustments:
1. An increase in the length of the school year; or
2. A decrease in the length of the school year;
(ii) Exceptions from the requirement that the school year be
completed within a 10–month period;
(iii) Adjustments in the length of the school day; and
(iv) Schools to be open on holidays.
(2) [These] THE adjustments UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION may be granted only if normal school attendance is prevented because of:
(i) [Natural] A NATURAL disaster;
(ii) [Civil] A CIVIL disaster; or

HOUSE BILL 1015 3
(iii) Severe weather conditions.
(3) Education funding from State or local sources may not be reduced if
there are less than 180 school days in any year because of an approved application under
paragraph (1)(i)2 of this subsection.
(4) In case of emergency, the State Board may open schools on holidays.
(c) (1) The following days are public school holidays:
(i) Thanksgiving Day and the day after;
(ii) Christmas Eve [and from then] through January 1, INCLUSIVE;
(iii) Martin Luther King, Jr. Day;
(iv) Presidents’ Day;
(v) The Friday before Easter [and from then] through the Monday
after Easter, INCLUSIVE;
(vi) Memorial Day; and
(vii) Primary and general election days.
(2) If the federal and State observances of a holiday are on different days,
the board of education of each county shall determine which date shall be the date of
observance for the public schools within the county.
(3) The public schools shall devote a part of at least one day to appropriate
exercises for each of the following:
(i) Washington’s Birthday;
(ii) Lincoln’s Birthday;
(iii) Veterans’ Day;
(iv) Columbus Day;
(v) Arbor Day;
(vi) Black History Month, with an emphasis on Harriet Tubman and
Frederick Douglass and the contributions they made in the fight against slavery; and
(vii) Any other day of national significance.

HOUSE BILL 1015
(4) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this article, the public schools,
in the following counties, may remain open and in session on primary and general election
days:
(i) Calvert;
(ii) Caroline;
(iii) Dorchester;
(iv) Kent;
(v) Talbot; and
(vi) Worcester.
(d) Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, the State Board shall
divide the school year into the terms it considers appropriate.
(e) (1) The county boards of Allegany, Anne Arundel, Calvert, Howard,
Montgomery, and Prince George’s counties, and the Board of School Commissioners of
Baltimore City, may elect to operate one or more schools within the county or Baltimore
City on a year–round basis, provided that the 180–day and the minimum hour
requirements under this section are met.
(2) Nothing in this section precludes a county board from conducting a
year–round pilot study or program that is funded by the county board.
(f) Publicly funded half–day prekindergarten programs are not subject to the
requirements of subsection (a) of this section.
(G) (1) ON REQUEST BY A COUNTY BOARD, THE STATE BOARD MAY
GRANT A WAIVER TO A MIDDLE SCHOOL OR HIGH SCHOOL TO BEGIN INSTRUCTION
AT A TIME EARLIER THAN THE TIME SPECIFIED UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(3) OF THIS
SECTION IF THE STATE BOARD DETERMINES THAT THERE IS A COMPELLING
REASON FOR A SCHOOL TO REQUIRE A DIFFERENT START TIME.
(2) A LACK OF FUNDING AVAILABLE FOR ALIGNING THE START OF
INSTRUCTION WITH THE TIMES SPECIFIED UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(3) OF THIS
SECTION IS NOT A COMPELLING REASON FOR GRANTING A WAIVER UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION.
[(g)] (H) Notwithstanding any other law and subject only to this section, each
county board annually shall set the start and end dates of the school year for schools in the
county.

HOUSE BILL 1015 5
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) Beginning in the 2026–2027 school year, and concluding before the start of the
following school year, each county board of education, including Baltimore City, and each
public charter school shall implement a public information campaign to raise awareness of:
(1) the health, safety, and academic impacts of sleep deprivation on middle
and high school students;
(2) the student benefits of a later school start time; and
(3) local strategies that will be used to implement the new start time.
(b) The public information campaign shall be targeted toward each school’s
community, including parents, teachers, school administrators, coaches, and other
interested parties and shall provide an opportunity for feedback.
(c) The State Department of Education shall assist a county board of education
or a public charter school with implementation of the public information campaign if the
county board or public charter school requests assistance.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.